Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2552.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1859. Temporary Waiver.--(a) Notwithstanding 22 Pa. Code § 339.22 (a)(9)(ii)(C) (relating to program content), the secretary shall waive the requirement that career and technical education programs must conclude in twelfth grade.(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit career and technical education programs from concluding in twelfth grade.(c) The secretary's authority under subsection (a) shall 12345678910111213141516171819 expire three years after the effective date of this subsection or upon promulgation of final regulations, whichever occurs first. The expiration of authority under this subsection shall not affect students enrolled in career and technical education programs prior to the expiration date.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Career and technical education programs" shall mean vocational or technical education programs as specified in 22 Pa. Code § 339.2 (relating to operation)."Secretary" shall mean the Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2552PN3462 - 2 - 1234567891011121314